Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2410YH (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. 327 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 422.12F Advanced registered nurse 1 preceptor tax credit. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âClinical practicumâ means a course of study designed 5 for the preparation of becoming an advanced registered nurse 6 practitioner, involving clinical preceptorships for practical 7 application of previously studied theory. 8 b. âClinical preceptorshipâ means a mentoring experience 9 under the direction of a nursing program where a preceptor is 10 used to provide a clinical learning experience for a student 11 enrolled in the nursing program. 12 c. âNursing programâ means a program approved by the board 13 of nursing pursuant to section 152.5. 14 d. âPreceptorâ means an advanced registered nurse 15 practitioner who is a resident and is currently licensed as 16 a registered nurse under chapter 152 or chapter 152E, and 17 who is licensed by the board as an advanced registered nurse 18 practitioner. 19 e. âStudentâ means a resident enrolled in a nursing program 20 fulfilling a required clinical practicum through a clinical 21 preceptorship. 22 2. To be eligible for the tax credit under this section for 23 a tax year, a preceptor must provide uncompensated instruction 24 and supervision during the required student clinical 25 preceptorship, be employed at the clinical facility where the 26 preceptorship occurs, be qualified for the preceptor role, 27 be selected by the nursing program in collaboration with the 28 clinical facility to participate in the clinical preceptorship, 29 and have at least one year of experience in the preceptor role. 30 3. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less credits 31 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by an advanced 32 registered nurse preceptor tax credit equal to one thousand 33 dollars per clinical preceptorship where at least one hundred 34 hours of clinical learning experience is provided, not to 35 -1- LSB 2410YH (3) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 327 exceed two thousand dollars in the aggregate. 1 4. Any credit in excess of the tax liability is refundable. 2 In lieu of claiming a refund, the taxpayer may elect to have 3 the overpayment shown on the taxpayerâs final, completed return 4 credited to the tax liability for the following tax year. 5 5. The preceptor shall be responsible for accurate 6 documentation of the studentâs experience during the clinical 7 preceptorship including the name of the student, the name 8 of the nursing program, the dates and times instruction and 9 supervision were provided to the student, and the year of the 10 studentâs expected graduation from the program. 11 6. Beginning November 1, 2028, and each November 1 12 thereafter, the department shall submit to the general 13 assembly a report describing the activities of the tax credit 14 for the most recent tax year for which the tax credit was 15 available. The report shall, at a minimum, include the 16 amount of tax credits claimed in the most recent tax year, the 17 locations where a preceptor provided uncompensated instruction 18 and supervision, the number of students supervised by the 19 preceptor, the number of hours clinical learning experiences 20 were provided by the preceptor, and any other information the 21 department deems necessary. 22 7. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 23 to administer this section. 24 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax years 25 beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 26